sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Ťažké strojárenstvo: Rýpadlá; Buldozéry; štiepkovače; Miešačky betónu; Žeriavy; Pásové nakladače; Sklápače; Elektrické a hybridné stroje; Bagre; Kombajny; Diely a príslušenstvo pre ťažké stroje; Zrovnávače; Finišery; Skrejpre; Pásové nakladače; Traktory; Rýpadlá; Kolesové nakladače; Kolesové traktorové skrejpre; Záhradné skrejpre
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Ciężki sprzęt: Koparki; Buldożery; Rębaki; Betoniarki; Żurawie; Ładowarki gąsienicowe; Wywrotki; Maszyny elektryczne i hybrydowe; Ciężkie koparki; Harvestery; Części i akcesoria do maszyn ciężkich; Równiarki samobieżne; Układarki; Zgarniarki; Miniładowarki; Ciągniki; Koparki do rowów; Ładowarki kołowe; Zgarniarki kołowe; Skrobaki
da: Erhverv og industri > Store maskiner: Rendegravere; Bulldozere; Flishugger; Betonblandere; Kraner; Bæltelæssere; Dumpere; Elektriske og hybride maskiner; Gravemaskiner; Høstmaskiner; Dele og tilbehør til tunge maskiner; Motorgrader; Brolæggere; Skrabere; Skovllæssere; Traktorer; Rendegravere; Hjullæssere; Hjultraktorskrabere; Gårdskrabere
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Ağır İş Makineleri: Kazıcı Yükleyiciler; Buldozerler; Ağaç Yonga Makineleri; Beton Mikserleri; Vinçler; Paletli Yükleyiciler; Çöp kamyonları; Elektrikli ve Hibrit Makineler; Ekskavatörler; Hasat Makinaları; Ağır İş Makinesi Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Motorlu Greyderler; Kaldırım Döşeme Makinaları; Kazıyıcılar; Mini Yükleyiciler; Traktörler; Hendek Kazıcılar; Tekerlekli Yükleyiciler; Tekerlekli Traktör Sıyırıcılar; Bahçe Sıyırıcılar
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Βαρέα μηχανήματα: Εκσκαφείς - φορτωτές; Μπουλντόζες; Μηχανές τεμαχισμού; Μπετονιέρες; Γερανοί; Ερπυστριοφόροι φορτωτές; Φορτηγά ανατρεπόμενα; Ηλεκτρικά & Υβριδικά μηχανήματα; Εκσκαφείς; Συγκομιστικές μηχανές; Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ βαρέων μηχανημάτων; Μηχανικοί οδοστρωτήρες; Μηχανήματα διάστρωσης ασφάλτου; Μηχανήματα απόξεσης/ξέστρες; Φορτωτές ολίσθησης; Τρακτέρ/γεωργικοί ελκυστήρες; Εκσκαφείς τάφρων; Τροχοφόροι φορτωτές; Τροχοφόρες ξέστρες με ελκυστήρα; Ξέστρες αυλής/χώρων
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Sunkioji technika: Ekskavatoriai; Buldozeriai; Smulkintuvai; Betono maišyklės; Kranai; Vikšriniai krautuvai; Savivarčiai; Elektrinės ir hibridinės mašinos; Ekskavatoriai; Kombainai; Sunkiųjų mašinų dalys ir priedai; Greideriai; Klojimo mašinos; Skreperis; Minikrautuvai; Traktoriai; Tranšėjų kasimo mašinos; Ratiniai krautuvai; Skreperiai su ratiniu traktoriumi; Kiemo skreperiai
sv: Företag och industri > Anläggningsmaskiner: Grävskopor; Bulldozers; Flismaskiner; Betongblandare; Kranar; Bandlastare; Sopbilar; Elektriska och hybridmaskiner; Grävmaskiner; Skördemaskiner; Delar och tillbehör till anläggningsmaskiner; Motordrivna hyvlar; Asfaltläggare; Skrapor; Skid-Steer-lastare; Traktorer; Dikesgrävare; Hjullastare; Hjultraktorskrapor; Gårdsskrapor
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Maquinaria pesada: Retroescavadeiras; Buldôzeres; Trituradoras; Betoneiras; Guindastes; Carregadores de esteira; Caminhões basculantes; Máquinas elétricas e híbridas; Escavadeiras; Colheitadeiras; Peças e acessórios para maquinaria pesada; Motoniveladoras; Pavimentadoras; Raspadores; Minicarregadeiras; Tratores; Valetadeiras; Carregadeiras de rodas; Raspadores de trator de rodas; Raspadores de quintal
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 重機: バックホー; ブルドーザー; 粉砕機; コンクリートミキサー; クレーン; クローラーローダー; ダンプトラック; 電気・ハイブリッド機械; 油圧ショベル; ハーベスター; 重機部品・アクセサリー; モーターグレーダー; 舗装機械; スクレーパ; スキッドステアローダ; トラクター; トレンチャー; ホイールローダー; ホイールトラクタースクレーパ; ヤードスクレーパー
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Schwermaschinen: Baggerlader; Bulldozer; Häcksler; Betonmischer; Krane; Raupenlader; Muldenkipper; Elektro- & Hybridmaschinen; Bagger; Erntemaschinen; Teile und Zubehör für Großmaschinen; Motorgrader; Betonstraßenbaumaschinen; Schürfzüge; Kompaktlader; Traktoren; Grabenfräsen; Radlader; Radtraktor-Schürfzüge; Hofschürfzüge
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > เครื่องสำหรับอุตสาหกรรมหนัก: รถแบ็คโฮ; รถดันดิน; เครื่องย่อยไม้; เครื่องผสมคอนกรีต; เครน; รถตักตีนตะขาบ; รถดัมพ์; เครื่องจักรไฟฟ้าและไฮบริด; รถขุด; รถเก็บเกี่ยว; ชิ้นส่วนเครื่องจักรกลหนักและอุปกรณ์เสริม; รถเกรด; รถปูทาง; รถปรับถนน; รถตักล้อยาง; แทรกเตอร์; รถขุดร่อง; รถตักแบบล้อ; รถแทรกเตอร์ปรับระดับแบบล้อ; รถปรับระดับสวน
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 重型機具: 反鏟挖土機; 推土機; 樹木粉碎機; 混凝土攪拌機; 起重機; 履帶式裝料機; 裝載機; 電動和混合動力機械; 挖土機; 收割機; 重型機械零件與配件; 平地機; 鋪路機; 鏟運機; 滑移裝載機; 曳引機; 開溝機; 輪式裝載機; 輪式曳引鏟運機; 庭院鏟運機
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Тяжелая техника: Экскаваторы-погрузчики; Бульдозеры; Рубильные машины; Бетономешалки; Краны; Гусеничные погрузчики; Самосвалы; Электрические и гибридные машины; Экскаваторы; Комбайны; Запчасти и аксессуары для тяжелой техники; Автогрейдеры; Асфальтоукладчики и бетоноукладчики; Скреперы; Мини-погрузчики; Тракторы; Траншеекопатели; Колесные погрузчики; Колесные тракторы-скреперы; Отвалы для навоза
nb: Forretninger og industri > Tunge maskiner: Traktorgravere; Bulldosere; Flishuggere; Betongblandere; Kraner; Crawler-lastere; Dumpere; Elektriske og hybride maskiner; Gravemaskiner; Høstemaskiner; Deler og tilbehør til tunge maskiner; Veiskraper; Asfaltutleggere; Skrapere; Skid-Steer-lastere; Traktorer; Grøftegravere; Hjullastere; Hjultraktorskrapere; Gårdskrapere
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Mașini grele: Buldoexcavatoare; Buldozere; Tocătoare; Betoniere; Macarale; Încărcătoare cu șenile; Camioane basculante; Utilaje electrice și hibride; Excavatoare; Secerători; Piese și accesorii pentru mașini grele; Gredere cu motor; Mașini de pavat drumuri; Screpere; Încărcătoare compacte; Tractoare; Utilaje de săpat șanțuri; Încărcătoare cu roți; Screpere cu roți; Screpere curți
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Raskaskalusto: Kaivurit; Puskutraktorit; Hakkurit; Betonimyllyt; Nosturit; Telakuormaajat; Kippiautot; Sähkö- ja hybridikoneet; Kaivinkoneet; Puimurit; Raskaiden koneiden osat ja tarvikkeet; Moottoroidut tiehöylät; Päällystyskoneet; Tiehöylät; Pienkuormaajat; Traktorit; Kaivukoneet; Pyörälliset kaivurikuormaajat; Pyörälliset traktoritiehöylät; Pihan maansiirtokoneet
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Nehézgépek: Kotrógépek; Bulldózerek; Aprítógépek; Betonkeverők; Daruk; Lánctalpas rakodók; Dömperek; Elektromos és hibrid gépek; Markológépek; Aratógépek; Nehézgépalkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Motoros gréderek; Burkolók; Kaparók; Szabad fordulós rakodók; Traktorok; Árokásók; Kerekes rakodók; Kerekes traktorkaparók; Udvari kaparók
en: Business & Industrial > Heavy Machinery: Backhoes; Bulldozers; Chippers; Concrete Mixers; Cranes; Crawler Loaders; Dump Trucks; Electric & Hybrid Machinery; Excavators; Harvesters; Heavy Machinery Parts & Accessories; Motor Graders; Pavers; Scrapers; Skid-Steer Loaders; Tractors; Trenchers; Wheel Loaders; Wheel Tractor Scrapers; Yard Scrapers
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Cơ khí nặng: Máy xúc gầu sấp; Máy ủi; Máy nghiền gỗ; Máy trộn bê tông; Cần cẩu; Máy bốc xếp bánh xích; Xe ben; Máy móc điện và lai; Máy xúc; Máy gặt; Linh kiện và phụ kiện máy móc hạng nặng; Máy san gạt; Máy lát đường; Máy cạp đất; Máy xúc lật trượt; Máy kéo; Máy đào rãnh; Máy xúc bánh lốp; Máy kéo gạt bánh lốp; Máy cào sân
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Тежка техника: Багери; Булдозери; Дробилки; Бетонобъркачки; Кранове; Верижни булдозери; Самосвали; Електрически и хибридни машини; Екскаватори; Комбайни; Части и аксесоари за тежки машини; Автогрейдери; Машини за полагане на пътна настилка; Скрепери; Минибулдозери; Трактори; Каналокопатели; Колесни булдозери; Колесни скрепери; Скрепери за двор
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 중공업: 백호; 불도저; 목재파쇄기; 콘크리트 믹서; 크레인; 트랙 로더; 덤프 트럭; 전기 및 하이브리드 기계; 굴삭기; 수확기; 중장비 부품 및 액세서리; 모터 그레이더; 도로 포장기계; 스크레이퍼; 스키드 스티어 로더; 트랙터; 트렌처; 휠 로더; 휠 트랙터 스크레이퍼; 야드 스크레이퍼
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Radni strojevi: Rovokopač-utovarivač; Buldožeri; Cjepači; Mješalice za beton; Dizalice; Utovarivači gusjeničari; Kiperi; Električni i hibridni strojevi; Bageri; Kombajni; Dijelovi i dodatna oprema za radne strojeve; Motorni grejderi; Finišeri; Strugači; Mali utovarivači; Traktori; Rovokopači; Utovarivači na kotačima; Traktori-strugači na kotačima; Dvorišni strugači
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Zwaar materieel: Graaflaadcombinaties; Bulldozers; Versnipperaars; Betonmixers; Kranen; Rupsladers; Kiepwagens; Elektrische en hybride machines; Graafmachines; Harvesters; Onderdelen en accessoires voor zware machines; Motorgraders; Afwerkmachines; Scrapers; Schrankladers; Tractoren; Sleuvengravers; Wielladers; Scrapers op wielen met tractor; Yard scrapers
it: Commercio e industria > Macchinari pesanti: Terne; Bulldozer; Truciolatori; Betoniere; Gru; Pale cingolate; Autocarri con cassone ribaltabile; Macchinari elettrici e ibridi; Escavatori; Mietitrici; Parti e accessori per macchinari pesanti; Motorgrader; Finitrici; Raschiatori; Pale compatte; Trattori; Trencher; Pale gommate; Raschiatori per trattori gommati; Raschiatori da cantiere
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Težka mehanizacija: Bagerji z izkopno roko; Buldožerji; Drobilniki; Mešalci betona; Žerjavi; Nakladalniki na gosenicah; Tovornjaki prekucniki; Električni in hibridni stroji; Bagri; Žetveni stroji; Deli in dodatki za težko mehanizacijo; Motorni grederji; Stroji za tlakovanje cest; Strgalci; Drsni nakladalniki; Traktorji; Rovokopači; Kolesni nakladalniki; Kolesni traktorski grederji; Dvoriščni strgalniki
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 重型机械: 反向铲; 推土机; 削片机; 混凝土搅拌机; 起重机; 履带式装载机; 自卸卡车; 电动和混合动力机械; 挖掘机; 收割机; 重型机械零件/配件; 平地机; 铺路机; 铲运机; 滑移装载机; 拖拉机; 挖沟机; 轮式装载机; 轮式拖拉机铲运机; 场地铲运机
es: Economía e industria > Maquinaria pesada: Retroexcavadoras; Buldócer; Astilladoras; Hormigoneras; Grúas; Cargadores sobre orugas; Camiones volquete; Maquinaria eléctrica e híbrida; Excavadoras; Cosechadoras; Piezas y accesorios para maquinaria pesada; Motoniveladoras; Máquinas de pavimentación; Traíllas; Minicargadoras; Tractores; Zanjadoras; Cargadoras con ruedas; Traíllas para tractores con ruedas; Traíllas para jardines
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Machinerie lourde: Tractopelle; Bulldozers; Déchiqueteuses; Bétonnières; Grues; Chargeuses sur chenilles; Camions bennes; Machines électriques et hybrides; Excavatrices; Moissonneuses; Pièces et accessoires pour machines lourdes; Niveleuses; Machines à paver; Décapeuses; Chargeuses compactes; Tracteurs; Trancheuses; Chargeuses sur pneus; Décapeuses tracteurs; Décapeuses de jardin
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Těžká stavební technika: Bagry; Buldozery; Štěpkovače; Míchačky betonu; Jeřáby; Pásové nakladače; Sklápěče; Elektrické a hybridní stroje; Rypadla; Sklízecí stroje; Díly a příslušenství pro těžkou techniku; Motorové grejdry; Stroje na pokládání vozovky; Skrejpry (škrabače); Podzemní nakladače; Zahradní traktory; Drážkovače; Kolové nakladače; Kolové traktorové skrejpry; Yard skrejpry
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Maquinaria pesada: Retroescavadoras; Buldózeres; Trituradores; Betoneiras; Gruas; Carregadoras de lagartas; Caminhões de descargas; Máquinas elétricas e híbridas; Escavadoras; Ceifeiras; Peças e acessórios de maquinaria pesada; Motoniveladoras; Espalhadoras-acabadoras; Raspadores; Pás carregadoras com direção diferencial; Tratores; Escavadoras de trincheiras; Carregadoras com rodas; Tratores raspadores com rodas; Raspadores de pátio